Hawaii statutes.
§484-1 Definitions. When used in this
chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Commissioner of securities" means
the commissioner of securities as defined in section 485A-102.

"Common promotional plan" means a
plan, undertaken by a single developer or group of developers acting in
concert, to offer subdivided land for sale or lease; provided that where such
land is offered for sale by the developer or group of developers acting in
concert, and the land is contiguous or is known, designated, or advertised as a
common unit or by a common name, the land shall be presumed, without regard to
the number of lots covered by each individual offering, as being offered for
sale or lease as part of a common promotional plan.

"Director" means the director of
commerce and consumer affairs.

"Disposition" includes sale, lease,
assignment, award by lottery, or any other transaction concerning a
subdivision, if undertaken for gain or profit.

"Material change" means any change
which either renders the information contained in the application or public
offering statement misleading or which substantively affects the rights or
obligations of a purchaser or a prospective purchaser of a subdivision lot,
such as, but not limited to, change in the nature or usage of the subdivision,
or change in the underlying encumbrances or restrictive covenants.

"Offer" includes every inducement,
solicitation, or attempt to encourage a person to acquire an interest in land,
if undertaken for gain or profit.

"Person" means an individual,
corporation, government, or governmental subdivision or agency, business trust,
estate, trust, partnership, unincorporated association, two or more of any of
the foregoing having a joint or common interest, or any other legal or
commercial entity.

"Public offering statement" means a
statement that fully and accurately discloses the physical characteristics of
the subdivided lands offered and all unusual or material circumstances or
features affecting the subdivided lands. The statement shall include the
information and statements required by section 484-6, and any other information
or statements required by rules adopted by the director pursuant to chapter 91.

"Purchaser" means a person who
acquires or attempts to acquire or succeeds to an interest in land.

"Subdivider" means any owner of
subdivided land who offers the land for disposition or the principal agent of
an owner, who has been duly authorized in a writing filed with the director.

"Subdivision" and "subdivided
lands" means any land which is divided or is proposed to be divided for
the purpose of disposition into two or more lots, parcels, units, or interests
and also includes any land whether contiguous or not if two or more lots,
parcels, units, or interests are offered as a part of a common promotional plan
of advertising and sale. [L 1967, c 223, §1; HRS §484-1; am L 1982, c 204, §8;
am L 1983, c 124, §17; gen ch 1985; am L 1992, c 132, §1; am L 2008, c 19, §49]

Cross References

Discrimination in real estate transactions, see chapter 515.

Real estate brokers and salespersons, see chapter 467.

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next